src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BERN-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: BERN ;
LEXICON BERN-orgsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;
LEXICON BERN-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: BERN ;


LEXICON BERN_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
BERN-plc ;

LEXICON BERN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON BERN-surmal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;
LEXICON BERN-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;

LEXICON OY-plc  !!= * __@CODE@__ ad hoc 
BERN-plc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON OY-sur  !!= * __@CODE@__ ad hoc 
BERN-sur ;

LEXICON OY-fem  !!= * __@CODE@__ ad hoc 
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
BERN-fem ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: C-FI-NEN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: C-FI-NEN ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: C-FI-NEN ;

LEXICON DUBAI !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:i flagK ;   	    
 +Attr:i flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Gen:i flagK ;   	
 +Sg+Acc:i flagK ;		
 +Sg+Ill:i%n flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc:i%>st flagK ;	
 +Sg+Com:i%>n flagK ;   
+Cmp/SgNom:i RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:i RProp ; 
 :i PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

LEXICON DUBAI-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: DUBAI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

LEXICON DUBAI-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: DUBAI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

LEXICON DUBAI-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: DUBAI ;

LEXICON DUBAI-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: DUBAI ;

LEXICON DUBAI_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
DUBAI-plc ;

LEXICON DUBAI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: DUBAI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: DUBAI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON DUBAI-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: DUBAI ;

LEXICON GATA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gata ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:gaten LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON JOKULL-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: LONDON ;
LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: LONDON ;
LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LONDON-ani !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: LONDON ;
LEXICON LONDON-atr !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Atr: LONDON ;
LEXICON LONDON-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON LONDON-malfem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: LONDON ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: LONDON ;

LEXICON LONDON-malplc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: LONDON ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LONDON-malsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON LONDON-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: LONDON ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON LONDON-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: LONDON ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: LONDON ;

LEXICON LONDON-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: LONDON ;

LEXICON LONDON_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
LONDON-plc ;


LEXICON LONDON-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LONDON-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;

!LEXICON MAKI-LOAN-plc   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;

LEXICON MAKI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON MAKI-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;


LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: NYSTØ ;
LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NYSTØ ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØ ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: NYSTØ ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: NYSTØ ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: NYSTØ ;
LEXICON NYSTØ-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: NYSTØ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
NYSTØ-plc ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NYSTØ ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØ ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: NYSTØ ;

LEXICON NYSTØ !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: flagK ;   	    
 +Attr: flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Gen: flagK ;   	
 +Sg+Acc: flagK ;		
 +Sg+Ill:%>n flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc:%>st flagK ;	
 +Sg+Com:%>i5n flagK ;  
 +Ess:%>n flagK ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

LEXICON PIPPI-LOAN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON PIPPI-ani !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:i ACCRA ;
LEXICON PIPPI-femsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

LEXICON PIPPI-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

LEXICON PIPPI-malfem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

LEXICON PIPPI-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

LEXICON PIPPI-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:i ACCRA ;
LEXICON PIPPI-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:i ACCRA ;
LEXICON PIPPI_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
PIPPI-plc ;

LEXICON PIPPI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON PIPPI-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;

LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: RONDANE ;


LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: RONDANE ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON RONDANE-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:e BEL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: RONDANE ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:e BEL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: RONDANE ;
LEXICON RONDANE-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: RONDANE ;
LEXICON RONDANE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: RONDANE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON RONDANE-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: RONDANE ;

LEXICON RONDANE !!= * __@CODE@__
:e ACCRA ;

LEXICON AANAAR-plc 	!!= * __@CODE@__
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: AANAAR ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON AANAAR-mal 	!!= * __@CODE@__
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: AANAAR ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON AANAAR-fem 	!!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: AANAAR ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

 
LEXICON AANAAR 	!!= * __@CODE@__ Goes to EEMEED
 +Sg+Nom: flagK ;   	    ! Aanaar
 +Attr: flagK ;   	    ! Aanaar
 +Sg+Gen: flagK ;   		! Aanaar
 +Sg+Acc: flagK ;		! Aanaar
 +Sg+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ân flagK ;	! Anarân
 +Sg+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ist flagK ;	! Anarist
 +Sg+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>áin flagK ;   ! Anaráin
 +Ess:^CSH^SVSH%>in flagK ;	! Anarin
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;  !FLAG?
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON JAVRI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ jävri, jeggi
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JAVRI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON JAVRI-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: JAVRI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Attr:^FVD^CSH flagK ; !Kaab Ant
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;

LEXICON JAVRI-fem !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: JAVRI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;


LEXICON JAVRI-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: JAVRI ;

LEXICON JAVRI !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to AIGI, but only Sg. Some case forms should be deleted for names? Only difference to VUONA is Ess/Par. Are they in use for names?
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;                         !  jävri
+Attr: flagK ;                         !  jävri
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;               ! jäävri
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;               !  jäävri
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;       ! jáávrán
!+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:â^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;       ! jáávrân : á:â is a freqv Err/Orth, áâ:â in twolc, or should we use a trigger?
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ;           ! jäävrist
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! javrijn
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;         ! jävrittáá
+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;                         !  jävrin
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;                         !  jävrid
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> RProp ; 
   :^WG^RLEN%> PERSNAME-GENCMPflag ;
  PERSNAME-NOMCMPflag ;



LEXICON JAAVRIH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  JAVRI-plurals, e.g. Kähteejäävrih
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JAAVRIH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON JAAVRIH !!= * __@CODE@__  plurals for JAVRI
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h flagK ;            ! jäävrih
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i flagK ;            ! jaavrij
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>i flagK ;            ! javrij
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id flagK ;           ! jaavrijd
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>id flagK ;    ! javrijd
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in flagK ;           ! jaavrijn
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>iguin flagK ;        ! javrijguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>igijn flagK ;        ! javrijgijn
+Cmp/PlNom:^WG^RLEN%>h RProp ;

LEXICON LYEME !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+Sg+Nom:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SVSH flagK ; 		! lyeme  
+Attr:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SVSH flagK ; 		! lyeme  
+Sg+Gen:K ;					! luámmán  
+Sg+Acc:K ;		 ! luámmán
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ân flagK ; 	! luáṃánân
+Sg+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ist flagK ;  ! luáṃánist
+Sg+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>áin flagK ;  ! luáṃánáin
+Cmp/SgNom:^FCD^WG^RLEN^SVSH%>  RProp ; ! lyemelitte
+Cmp/SgGen:  RProp ;


LEXICON VAARI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VAARI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

!LEXICON VAARI-obj   * __@CODE@__ 
!+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: VAARI ;
!
!LEXICON VAARI-org   * __@CODE@__ 
!+N+Prop+Sem/Org: VAARI ;
!
!LEXICON VAARI-mal   * __@CODE@__ 
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: VAARI ;
!
!LEXICON VAARI-fem   * __@CODE@__ 
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: VAARI ;
!
!LEXICON VAARI-ani   * __@CODE@__ 
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: VAARI ;


LEXICON VAARI   !!= * __@CODE@__ to SAAMI
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;                 ! sääm7i,
+Attr: flagK ;                 ! sääm7i,
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;          ! säämi,
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;      ! säämi,
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>n flagK ;          ! sáám7án ä>á !, 
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st flagK ;         ! säämist
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN%>in   flagK ;       ! saamijn  # please add ä > a _ ij (twolc)
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá  flagK ; ! sämittáá
+Ess:^CLEN%>n  flagK ;          ! säämmin
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;           ! säämmid
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON VAARIH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  VAARI-plurals
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VAARIH ;


LEXICON VAARIH   !!= * __@CODE@__ VAARI-plurals
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>h flagK ;          ! säämih
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>i flagK ;          ! saamij
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RVSH%>i flagK ;    ! samij
+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id flagK ;         ! saamijd
+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id flagK ;         ! saamijd
+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in flagK ;         ! saamijn
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>iguin flagK ; ! samijguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>igijn flagK ; ! samijguin
+Pl+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ittáá flagK ; ! samijttáá
+Cmp/PlNom:^WG%>h RProp ; 


LEXICON CIELGI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ to CAACI
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CIELGI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
